Massachusetts, session 194th, H1177.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The first paragraph of section 13 of chapter 167 of the General Laws, as appearing in the
2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following sentence:- Each report shall
include goals included in the strategic plan and the most recent rating from the commissioner as
required under 209 CMR 46.00.
of 1